Mississippi, session 2026, HB513.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 41-137-61, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: [Until July 1, 2030, this section shall read as follows:] 41-137-61.  Twelve and one-half percent (12-1/2%) of all fees and * * *fines tax revenues collected by the MDOR and MDOH according to the provisions of this chapter each year up to the amount specified in the next sentence shall be deposited into the Mississippi Public Health Trust Fund created by Section 41-3-24 and the remainder of such fees and tax revenues together with any fines collected by the MDOR and MDOH according to the provisions of this chapter each year shall be deposited into the State General Fund.  The amount to be deposited into the Mississippi Public Health Trust Fund under this section each year shall be equal to the amount of all fees and tax revenues collected by the MDOR and MDOH during the previous calendar year less the amount appropriated by the Legislature to the MDOR and MDOH for the administration of the Medical Cannabis Program for the upcoming fiscal year. [From and after July 1, 2030, this section shall read as follows:] 41-137-61.  All fees, tax revenues and fines collected by the MDOR and MDOH according to the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited into the State General Fund. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.